Utah statutes.
70A-9a-521.    Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment.

(1)  A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial financing statement in the form and format set forth in the final official text of the 1999 revisions to Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code promulgated by The American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, except for a reason set forth in Subsection 70A-9a-516(2).

(2)  A filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written record in the form and format set forth in the final official text of the 1999 revisions to Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code promulgated by The American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, except for a reason set forth in Subsection 70A-9a-516(2).



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

